Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-155
Notation of lien; fees.

(1) For each notation of a lien by a county, the fee shall be seven dollars. Two dollars shall be retained by the county. Four dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. One dollar shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(2) For each notation of a lien by the department, the fee shall be seven dollars. Four dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Three dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund.

(3) An approved licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to section 60-1507 may collect the fees prescribed by this section and shall remit any such fees to the appropriate county treasurer or the department.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 55;

Laws 2013, LB30, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 16.